Wisconsin, session 2025, AB183.
do enact as follows:AB183,11Section 1. 70.995 (2) (vb) and (vd) of the statutes are created to read:AB183,2,2270.995 (2) (vb) 7213 - Linen supply.AB183,2,33(vd) 7218 - Industrial launderers.AB183,24Section 2. 71.07 (5n) (a) 9. d. of the statutes is created to read:AB183,2,12571.07 (5n) (a) 9. d. The following items that are laundered or dry cleaned by 6the claimant and sold, leased, or rented to or exchanged with industrial, 7commercial, or government users: uniforms, gowns, and coats of the type used by 8doctors, nurses, barbers, beauticians, and restaurant employees; table linens, bed 9linens, towels, and similar items; work uniforms and related work clothing, such as 10protective flame and heat resistant apparel and clean room apparel; mats and rugs; 11dust control items, such as treated mops, rugs, mats, dust tool covers, and cloths; 12wiping towels; and other similar items.AB183,313Section 3. 71.28 (5n) (a) 9. d. of the statutes is created to read:AB183,2,211471.28 (5n) (a) 9. d. The following items that are laundered or dry cleaned by 15the claimant and sold, leased, or rented to or exchanged with industrial, 16commercial, or government users: uniforms, gowns, and coats of the type used by 17doctors, nurses, barbers, beauticians, and restaurant employees; table linens, bed 18linens, towels, and similar items; work uniforms and related work clothing, such as 19protective flame and heat resistant apparel and clean room apparel; mats and rugs; 20dust control items, such as treated mops, rugs, mats, dust tool covers, and cloths; 21wiping towels; and other similar items.AB183,422Section 4. Initial applicability.AB183,3,21(1) The treatment of s. 70.995 (2) (vb) and (vd) first applies to property tax 2exemptions as of January 1, 2025.AB183,3,43(2) The treatment of ss. 71.07 (5n) (a) 9. d. and 71.28 (5n) (a) 9. d. first applies 4to taxable years beginning on January 1, 2025.AB183,3,55